Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.080

Vacancies.

In the event a commission member resigns, is disqualified, or vacates his or her position on the commission for any other reason, the appointing agency that originally appointed such member shall within sixty days appoint a new member to fill the term of the vacated member.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6029; 1969 c 129 s 8.]